src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/A-haaitis_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Adjective - hääitis: # 2A v-k-v, t->tt, ää->á, i >á, VV > V
    hääitis+A+Sg+Nom: hääitis
    hääitis+A+Sg+Gen: háittás
    hääitis+A+Sg+Acc: háittás
    hääitis+A+Sg+Ill: háittásân
    hääitis+A+Sg+Loc: háittásist
    hääitis+A+Sg+Com: háittásáin
    hääitis+A+Sg+Abe: háittásttáá
    hääitis+A+Ess: [háittásin, hä'itisin, häitisin]
    hääitis+A+Par: [háittásid, hä'itisid, häitisid]
    hääitis+A+Pl+Nom: háittáseh
    hääitis+A+Pl+Gen: háittásij
    hääitis+A+Pl+Acc: háittásijd
    hääitis+A+Pl+Ill: háittásáid
    hääitis+A+Pl+Loc: háittásijn
    hääitis+A+Pl+Com: háittásijguin
    hääitis+A+Pl+Abe: háittásijttáá
